Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-259
Jail facilities; establishment.

A primary city may erect, establish, and regulate houses of correction, jails, community residential centers, work release centers, halfway houses, and such other places of control or confinement as may be designated as a jail facility from time to time by the city, including station houses and other buildings necessary to the keeping and confinement of prisoners, and provide for the government and support of same.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, LIX, p. 142;

R.S.1913, § 4469;

C.S.1922, § 3854;

C.S.1929, § 15-257;

R.S.1943, § 15-259;

Laws 1979, LB 315, § 1.